Utah statutes.
63B-5-108.   Creation of sinking fund.
(1)  There is created a sinking fund, to be administered by the state
treasurer, entitled the "1996 General Obligation Bonds Sinking Fund."
(2)  All monies deposited in the sinking fund, from whatever source, shall be
used to pay debt service on the bonds.
(3)  The proceeds of all taxes levied under this chapter are appropriated to
this fund.
(4)  The state treasurer may create separate accounts within the sinking fund
for each series of bonds issued.
